North Carolina, session 2025, SB399.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Environmental Quality (Department) shall conduct
a study and analysis of nutrient management strategies and compilation of existing water quality
data pertaining to Jordan Lake. As part of this study, the Department shall do all of the following:
(1) Review data collected by the Department and other stakeholders from water
sampling (including the study conducted by the University of North Carolina
pursuant to Section 14.13(c) of S.L. 2016-94, as amended) in areas subject to
the Jordan Lake Water Supply Nutrient Strategies (Strategies).
(2) Compare trends in water quality to the implementation of the various elements
of each of the Strategies and evaluate the extent to which those elements are
resulting in improvements in water quality.
(3) Examine data regarding natural background conditions for total nitrogen and
total phosphorus in Jordan Lake, and internal loading of those nutrients, and
evaluate whether portions of the Strategies imposing nutrient reduction
requirements on upstream users will lower levels of chlorophyll-a.
(4) Evaluate and determine additional actions or funding needed to revise water
quality criteria in order to produce realistic, achievable site-specific criteria
that ensure that Jordan Lake maintains all designated uses in the most
cost-effective manner.
SECTION 2. The Department shall report to the Environmental Review
Commission and the Environmental Management Commission no later than January 31, 2027,
with interim reports no later than January 31, 2026, and July 31, 2026. The final report shall
include any statutory or regulatory changes necessary to implement the recommendations made
in the report.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S399-v-1*